Florida, session 2026, HB753.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section
1012.34, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1012.34 Personnel evaluation procedures and criteria.—
(3) EVALUATION PROCEDURES AND CRITERIA.—Instructional
personnel and school administrator performance evaluations must
be based upon the performance of students assigned to their
classrooms or schools, as provided in this section. Pursuant to
this section, a school district's performance evaluation system
is not limited to basing unsatisfactory performance of
instructional personnel and school administrators solely upon
student performance, but may include other criteria to evaluate
instructional personnel and school administrators' performance,
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb753 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 753 2026 Legislature
or any combination of student performance and other criteria.
Evaluation procedures and criteria must comply with, but are not
limited to, the following:
(a) A performance evaluation must be conducted for each
employee at least once a year, except that a classroom teacher,
as defined in s. 1012.01(2)(a), excluding substitute teachers,
who is newly hired by the district school board must be observed
and evaluated at least twice in the first year of teaching in
the school district. The performance evaluation must be based
upon sound educational principles and contemporary research in
effective educational practices. The evaluation criteria must
include:
1. Performance of students.—At least one-third of a
performance evaluation must be based upon data and indicators of
student performance, as determined by each school district. This
portion of the evaluation must include growth or achievement
data of the teacher's students or, for a school administrator,
the students attending the school over the course of at least 3
years. If less than 3 years of data are available, the years for
which data are available must be used. The proportion of growth
or achievement data may be determined by instructional
assignment.
2. Instructional practice.—For instructional personnel, at
least one-third of the performance evaluation must be based upon
instructional practice. Evaluation criteria used when annually
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb753 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 753 2026 Legislature
observing classroom teachers, as defined in s. 1012.01(2)(a),
excluding substitute teachers, must include indicators based
upon each of the Florida Educator Accomplished Practices adopted
by the State Board of Education.
a. For instructional personnel who are not classroom
teachers or certified school counselors, evaluation criteria
must be based upon indicators of the Florida Educator
Accomplished Practices and may include specific job expectations
related to student support.
b. For certified school counselors, evaluation criteria
must be based upon indicators of the Florida School Counseling
Standards adopted by the State Board of Education.
c. This section does not preclude a school administrator
from visiting and observing classroom teachers throughout the
school year for purposes of providing mentorship, training,
instructional feedback, or professional learning.
3. Instructional leadership.—For school administrators, at
least one-third of the performance evaluation must be based on
instructional leadership. Evaluation criteria for instructional
leadership must include indicators based upon each of the
leadership standards adopted by the State Board of Education
under s. 1012.986, including performance measures related to the
effectiveness of classroom teachers in the school, the
administrator's appropriate use of evaluation criteria and
procedures, recruitment and retention of effective and highly
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb753 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 753 2026 Legislature
effective classroom teachers, improvement in the percentage of
instructional personnel evaluated at the highly effective or
effective level, and other leadership practices that result in
student learning growth. The system may include a means to give
parents and instructional personnel an opportunity to provide
input into the administrator's performance evaluation.
4. Other indicators of performance.—For instructional
personnel and school administrators, the remainder of a
performance evaluation may include, but is not limited to,
professional and job responsibilities as recommended by the
State Board of Education or identified by the district school
board and, for instructional personnel, peer reviews,
objectively reliable survey information from students and
parents based on teaching practices that are consistently
associated with higher student achievement, and other valid and
reliable measures of instructional practice.
Section 2. Subsection (6) of section 1012.55, Florida
Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (7), and a new subsection
(6) is added to that section, to read:
1012.55 Positions for which certificates required.—
(6) A person who is seeking employment as a school
counselor is exempt from the educator certification requirements
in s. 1012.56(2)(g) and (i). Such exemption does not preclude a
school district from requiring a certified school counselor to
100 satisfy the requirements of s. 1012.56(2)(g) and (i) as a
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb753 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 753 2026 Legislature
101 condition of employment.
102 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb753 -02-er